Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.090

Corporate authorities may refer ordinance levying tax to voters.

The corporate authorities of a municipality adopting an ordinance for the levy and collection of an excise tax or additional tax as provided in RCW 35.95.040 may refer such ordinance to the voters of the municipality before making such ordinance effective.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 145 s 67.]